Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-532
Insurance carrier not authorized to transact business in state; defaults; effect.

If any insurance carrier not authorized to transact business in this state, which has qualified to furnish proof of financial responsibility, defaults in any said undertakings or agreements, the department shall not thereafter accept as proof any certificate of said carrier whether theretofore filed or thereafter tendered as proof, so long as such default continues.

Laws 1949, c. 178, § 32, p. 495.